Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.145

License, certificates of registration, permit, examination, and renewal fees.

Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 for the issuance, renewal, or administration of the following licenses, certificates of registration, permits, duplicate licenses, renewals, or examination:

(1) For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry issued upon an examination given by the examining board;

(2) For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry issued upon the basis of a license issued in another state;

(3) For a license as a veterinary technician;

(4) For a certificate of registration as a veterinary medication clerk;

(5) For a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry. The temporary permit fee shall be accompanied by the full amount of the examination fee; and

(6) For a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine.

[ 2007 c 235 s 7; 2000 c 93 s 14; 1996 c 191 s 80; 1993 c 78 s 7; 1991 c 332 s 42; 1991 c 3 s 248; 1985 c 7 s 73; 1983 c 102 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 84; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 20; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 9; 1959 c 92 s 12; 1941 c 71 s 19; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-19. Prior: 1907 c 124 ss 9, 10. Formerly RCW 18.92.090 and 18.92.140.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—1991 c 332: See note following RCW 18.130.010.